Florida, session 2026, SB8.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 212 213 Section 1.âThe facts stated in the preamble to this act are 214 found and declared to be true. 215 Section 2.âThe Lee County Sheriffâs Office is authorized 216 and directed to appropriate from funds not otherwise encumbered 217 and to draw a warrant in the sum of $626,769.93 payable to 218 Patricia Ermini as compensation for injuries and damages 219 sustained. 220 Section 3.âThe amount paid by the Lee County Sheriffâs 221 Office, pursuant to s. 768.28, Florida Statutes, and the amount 222 awarded under this act are intended to provide the sole 223 compensation for all present and future claims arising out of 224 the factual situation described in this act which resulted in 225 injuries and damages to Patricia Ermini. The total amount paid 226 for attorney fees relating to this claim may not exceed 25 227 percent of the total amount awarded under this act. 228 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.